Illinois, session 104th, SB1981.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 5Property Tax Relief Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to relieve 7citizens from the burdens of extraordinary property taxes 8against their increasingly restricted earning power, and 9thereby to reduce the requirements for public housing in this 10State.  11    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Act.14    "Claimant" means an individual who has filed a claim for a 15property tax relief grant under this Act.16    "Claim year" means the calendar year prior to the period 17of time during which a claimant may file an application for 18benefits under this Act.19    "Department" means the Department of Revenue. 20    "Director" means the Director of Revenue.21    "Eligible residence" means a residence with an assessed 22market value of less than $350,000.  SB1981- 2 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1    "Federal poverty level" means the federal poverty income 2guidelines as determined annually by the United States 3Department of Health and Human Services and updated 4periodically in the Federal Register by that Department under 5the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).6    "Gross rent" means the total amount paid solely for the 7right to occupy a residence. If the residence is a nursing or 8sheltered care home, "gross rent" means the amount paid in a 9taxable year that is attributable to the cost of housing, but 10not of meals or care, for the claimant in that home, determined 11in accordance with rules adopted by the Department.12    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 13applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 14applicant as their principal place of residence.15    "Household income" means the combined income of the 16members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 17taxable year. 18    "Income" means the taxpayer's adjusted gross income, 19properly reportable for federal income tax purposes under the 20provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, modified by adding 21thereto the sum of the following amounts to the extent those 22amounts are deducted or excluded from the taxpayer's gross 23income in the computation of the taxpayer's adjusted gross 24income:25        (1) an amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued as 26    interest or dividends during the taxable year;  SB1981- 3 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1        (2) an amount equal to the amount of tax imposed on the 2    taxpayer by the Illinois Income Tax Act and paid by or on 3    behalf of the taxpayer for the taxable year;4        (3) an amount equal to all amounts received by the 5    taxpayer during the taxable year as an annuity under an 6    annuity, endowment, or life insurance contract or under 7    any other contract or agreement;8        (4) an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid to 9    the taxpayer under the federal Social Security Act during 10    the taxable year;11        (5) an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid to 12    the taxpayer under the Railroad Retirement Act during the 13    taxable year;14        (6) an amount equal to the total amount of cash public 15    assistance payments received by the taxpayer from any 16    governmental agency during the taxable year other than 17    benefits received pursuant to this Act;18        (7) an amount equal to any net operating loss 19    carryover deduction or capital loss carryover deduction 20    taken by the taxpayer during the taxable year; and 21        (8) an amount equal to any benefits received by the 22    taxpayer under the Workers' Compensation Act or the 23    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act during the taxable 24    year.25    "Income" does not include veteran's benefits or any 26distributions or items of income described under subparagraph   SB1981- 4 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1(X) of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 203 of the 2Illinois Income Tax Act or any payments under Section 2201 or 3Section 2202 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 42009.5    "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal 6Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws relating to 7federal income taxes in effect for the year.8    "Maximum income limitation" means the State median 9adjusted gross income for the taxable year for which the 10applicant is seeking a grant under this Act.11    "Property taxes accrued" means the ad valorem property 12taxes extended against a residence, but does not include 13special assessments, interest, or charges for service. For the 14purpose of calculating the property taxes accrued for real 15estate improved with a multidwelling or multipurpose building, 16ad valorem property taxes extended against a residence within 17such a building shall be an amount equal to the same percentage 18of the total property taxes extended against that real estate 19as improved as the value of the residence is to the total value 20of the building. If the multidwelling building is owned and 21operated as a cooperative, the value of an individual 22residence is the value of the interest in the cooperative held 23by the owner of record of the legal or equitable interest, 24other than a leasehold interest, in the cooperative which 25confers the right to occupy that residence. In determining the 26amount of the grant under Section 15, the applicable property   SB1981- 5 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1taxes accrued, as determined under this Section, are those 2payable or paid in the last preceding taxable year.3    In addition, if the residence is a mobile home, as defined 4in and subject to the tax imposed by the Mobile Home Local 5Services Tax Act, "property taxes accrued" includes the amount 6of privilege tax paid during the calendar year for which 7benefits are claimed under that Act on that mobile home. If (i) 8the residence is a mobile home, (ii) the resident is the record 9owner of the property upon which the mobile home is located, 10and (iii) the resident is liable for the taxes imposed under 11the Property Tax Code for both the mobile home and the 12property, then "property taxes accrued" includes the amount of 13property taxes paid on both the mobile home and the property 14upon which the mobile home is located.15    "Rules" means both rules adopted and forms prescribed by 16the Department.17    "Rent constituting property taxes accrued" means 20% of 18the amount of gross rent paid in a taxable year for a residence 19that was subject to ad valorem property taxes in that year 20under the Property Tax Code.21    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place occupied in 22this State by a household and so much of the surrounding land 23as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, 24and includes rental property, mobile homes, single family 25dwellings, and units in multifamily, multidwelling, or 26multipurpose buildings. If the assessor has established a   SB1981- 6 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1specific legal description for a portion of property 2constituting the residence, then that portion of property 3shall be deemed "residence" for the purposes of this Act. 4    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 5valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding calendar 6year are levied. 7    Section 15. Amount of grant. 8    (a) Beginning on January 1, 2026, any individual (i) whose 9household is liable for the payment of property taxes accrued 10with respect to an eligible residence or who has paid rent 11constituting property taxes accrued with respect to an 12eligible residence and (ii) is domiciled in this State at the 13time the individual files a claim under this Act is entitled to 14a grant under this Act.15    (b) For 2025 claim year applications submitted during 16calendar year 2026, an applicant is not eligible for a grant 17under this Act unless the applicant has an annual household 18income for the taxable year for which the claim is made of less 19than the maximum income limitation for that taxable year.20    (c) Except as otherwise provided, the maximum amount of 21the grant which a claimant is entitled is the amount by which 22the property taxes accrued which were paid or payable during 23the last preceding taxable year or rent constituting property 24taxes accrued upon the claimant's residence for the last 25preceding taxable year exceeds 5% of the claimant's household   SB1981- 7 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1income for that year, but in no event may the grant exceed 2$5,000 for any taxable year. 3    (d) If the applicant's household income in one or more 4months during a year includes cash assistance in excess of $55 5per month from the Department of Healthcare and Family 6Services or the Department of Human Services that was 7determined under rules of the applicable Department on a 8measure of need that included an allowance for actual rent or 9property taxes paid by the recipient of that assistance, then 10the amount of grant to which that household is entitled shall 11be the product of: (1) the maximum amount computed as 12specified in subsection (c); and (2) the ratio of the number of 13months in which household income did not include such cash 14assistance over $55 to the number 12. If household income did 15not include such cash assistance over $55 for any months 16during the year, the amount of the grant to which the household 17is entitled shall be the maximum amount computed as specified 18in subsection (c). For purposes of this subsection, "cash 19assistance" does not include any amount received under the 20federal Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program.21    (e) If title to the residence is held jointly by the 22claimant with a person who is not a member of the claimant's 23household, then the amount of property taxes accrued used in 24computing the amount of grant to which he or she is entitled 25shall be the same percentage of property taxes accrued as is 26the percentage of ownership held by the claimant in the   SB1981- 8 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1residence.2    (f) If a claimant has occupied more than one residence in 3the taxable year, the claimant may claim only one residence 4for any part of a month. In the case of property taxes accrued, 5the claimant shall prorate one-twelfth of the total property 6taxes accrued on the claimant's residence to each month that 7the claimant owned and occupied that residence, and, in the 8case of rent constituting property taxes accrued, shall 9prorate each month's rent payments to the residence actually 10occupied during that month. 11    Section 20. Procedure.12    (a) Claims must be filed after January 1 on forms 13prescribed by the Department of Revenue or as itemized 14deductions on the Illinois income tax return. No claim may be 15filed more than one year after December 31 of the year for 16which the claim is filed. 17    (b) The right to file a claim under this Act shall be 18personal to the claimant and shall not survive the claimant's 19death, but that right may be exercised on behalf of a claimant 20by the claimant's legal guardian or attorney-in-fact. If a 21claimant dies after having filed a timely claim, the amount 22thereof shall be disbursed to the claimant's surviving spouse 23or, if no spouse survives, to the claimant's surviving 24dependent minor children in equal parts, provided the spouse 25or child, as the case may be, resided with the claimant at the   SB1981- 9 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1time the claim was filed. If at the time of disbursement 2neither the claimant nor the claimant's spouse is surviving, 3and no dependent minor children of the claimant are surviving 4the amount of the claim shall escheat to the State. 5    (c) Only one member of a household may file a claim under 6this Act in any calendar year. If both members of a household 7are otherwise entitled to claim a grant under this Act and are 8filing taxes separately, they must agree as to which of them 9will file a claim for that year.10    (d) A person may not under any circumstances charge a fee 11to a claimant under this Act for assistance in completing an 12application form for a property tax relief grant under this 13Act. 14    Section 25. Administration. 15    (a) Upon receipt of a timely filed claim, the Department 16shall determine whether the claimant is a person entitled to a 17grant under this Act and the amount of grant to which the 18claimant is entitled under this Act. The Department may 19require the claimant to furnish reasonable proof of the 20statements of domicile, household income, rent paid, property 21taxes accrued, and other matters on which entitlement is 22based, and may withhold payment of a grant until such 23additional proof is furnished.24    (b) If the Department finds that the gross rent used in the 25computation by a claimant of rent constituting property taxes   SB1981- 10 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1accrued exceeds the fair rental value for the right to occupy 2that residence, the Department may determine the fair rental 3value for that residence and recompute rent constituting 4property taxes accrued accordingly. 5    (c) The Department shall deny claims that have been 6fraudulently prepared or when it finds that the claimant has 7acquired title to the claimant's residence or has paid rent 8for the claimant's residence primarily for the purpose of 9receiving a grant under this Act. 10    Section 30. Payment and denial of claims. 11    (a) The Director shall order the payment of grants under 12this Act from appropriations made for that purpose in the 13amounts to which the Department has determined that claimants 14are entitled. If a claim is denied, the Director shall cause 15written notice of that denial and the reasons for that denial 16to be sent to the claimant. 17    (b) If the amount of the grant under this Act is less than 18one dollar, the Department shall pay to the claimant one 19dollar. 20    (c) Any person aggrieved by an action or determination of 21the Department arising under any of its powers or duties under 22this Act may request in writing that the Department reconsider 23its action or determination, setting out the facts upon which 24the request is based. The Department shall consider the 25request and either modify or affirm its prior action or   SB1981- 11 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1determination. The Department may adopt, by rule, procedures 2for conducting its review under this Section.  3    Section 35. Records. Every claimant of a grant under this 4Act shall keep such records, render such statements, file such 5forms, and comply with such rules as the Department may from 6time to time prescribe. The Department may, by rule, require 7landlords to furnish to tenants statements as to gross rent or 8rent constituting property taxes accrued. 9    Section 40. Confidentiality. 10    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, all 11information received by the Department, or its successors, 12from claims filed under this Act, or from any investigation 13conducted under the provisions of this Act, shall be 14confidential, except for official purposes within the 15Department or pursuant to official procedures for collection 16of any State tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal 17penalty or sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute 18imposing a State tax, and any person who divulges any such 19information in any manner, except for such purposes and 20pursuant to order of the Director or in accordance with a 21proper judicial order, shall be guilty of a Class A 22misdemeanor. 23    (b) Nothing contained in this Act shall prevent the 24Director from publishing or making available reasonable   SB1981- 12 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1statistics concerning the operation of the grant program 2contained in this Act wherein the contents of claims are 3grouped into aggregates in such a way that information 4contained in any individual claim shall not be disclosed.  5    Section 45. Fraud; error. 6    (a) Any person who files a fraudulent claim for a grant 7under this Act, or who for compensation prepares a claim for a 8grant and knowingly enters false information on an application 9for any claimant under this Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony 10for the first offense and is guilty of a Class 3 felony for 11each subsequent offense. 12    (b) The Department may recover from a claimant any amount 13paid to that claimant under this Act on account of an erroneous 14or fraudulent claim, together with 6% interest per year. 15Amounts recoverable from a claimant by the Department under 16this Act may, but need not, be recovered by offsetting the 17amount owed against any future grant payable to the person 18under this Act. 19    (c) A prosecution for a violation of this Section may be 20commenced at any time within 3 years of the commission of that 21violation.  22    Section 50. Arrangements and captions. No inference, 23implication, or presumption of legislative construction shall 24be drawn or made by reason of the location or grouping of any   SB1981- 13 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1particular Section or provision of this Act, nor shall any 2caption be given any legal effect. 3    Section 55. Severability. If any clause, sentence, 4section, provision or part of this Act or the application 5thereof to any person or circumstance shall be adjudged to be 6unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act or its application 7to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is 8held invalid, shall not be affected thereby. 9    Section 60. Rules. 10    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, 11the Department may adopt rules regarding applications, proof 12of eligibility, required identification information, use of 13social security numbers, counting of income, and a method of 14computing "gross rent" in the case of a claimant living in a 15nursing or sheltered care home, and any other rules necessary 16for the cost-efficient operation of the program established 17under Section 15.18    (b) The Department shall, to the extent of appropriations 19made for that purpose:20        (1) secure the cooperation of other State agencies and 21    local business establishments to facilitate distribution 22    of applications under this Act to those eligible to file 23    claims; and24        (2) through the use of direct mail, newspaper   SB1981- 14 -LRB104 04968 HLH 14995 b1    advertisements, radio advertisements, television 2    advertisements, and all other appropriate means of 3    communication, conduct an ongoing public relations program 4    to increase awareness of eligible citizens of the benefits 5    under this Act and the procedures for applying for those 6    benefits.